Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.090

Program administrator—Duties.

The program administrator shall:

(1) Solicit and accept grants and donations from private sources to match state funds appropriated for the GET ready for math and science scholarship program;

(2) Develop and implement an application, selection, and notification process for awarding GET ready for math and science scholarships;

(3) Notify institutions of higher education of scholarship recipients who will attend their institutions and inform them of the terms of the students' eligibility; and

(4) Report to private donors on the program outcomes and facilitate contact between scholarship recipients and donors, if the recipients have given the program administrator permission to do so, in order for donors to offer employment opportunities, internships, and career information to recipients.

[ 2007 c 214 s 9.]